src/phonology/som-phon.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Somali morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

 ! ------------------------- !
 !  Morphophonological notes !
 ! ------------------------- !
	
	! Phonological Processes in Somali
	!
	!	Somali has several phonological alternations involving reduplication, lenition, vowel harmony
	!	and tone.
	!
	!	The hopes with this documentation is that it will either make twolc rules clearer, or help
	!	if it comes time to completely redo all the rules.

	! Spreading processes

	! Lenition
	!
	!	The lenis stop series in Somali <b d g> alternates with the fortis series <t k>, note that
	!	the <b> does not actually participate. Lenis stops are found in coda positions, and fortis
	!	stops are found elsewhere. The alternation occurs in both nouns and verbs.
	!
	!		ilig 'tooth'   ~   iligga 'tooth (Def.)'     ~   ilko 'teeth (Indef.)'
	!		arag 'see'     ~   aragtaa '2Sg/3SgF sees'   ~   arkaa '1Sg/3SgM sees'

	! Voicing assimilation
	!   
	!	Stops assimilate for voicing (or lenis/fortis), particularly across morpheme boundaries,
	!	however they only assimilate if they share place of articulation.
	!
	!		aragtaa 		'2Sg/3SgF sees'
	!
	!		wararka			'the news'
	!		buugga 			'the book'
	!
	!		naagta			'the woman'
	!		jaamacadda 		'the university'
	!
	!	This also follows for the retroflex segment <dh>, however the sequence <dhdh> is shortened
	!	to <dh>.
	!
	!		gabadh			'(a) girl'
	!		gabadha			'the girl'

	! Vowel ablaut
	!
	!	Vowels are subject to two main types of ablaut: (1) full ablaut across back consonants,
	!	and (2) partial ablaut with <a> ~ <e> preceding the high vowel <i>.
	!
	!	Full ablaut is constrained to morpheme boundaries: and most commonly occurs in the 'waxa'
	!	focus marker.
	!
	!		waxaan 'foc+1Sg'			magac						rah
	!		wuxuu  'foc+3SgM'			magucu	/ magacu			ruhu
	!									magicii	/ magicii 

	!	Full ablaut appears to be optional in some words.
	!
	!	Partial ablaut occurs in verbal infinitives with mostly any word of the pattern CaC. When
	!	the infinitive ending <i> is appended, <a> raises to <e>. It also occurs around person
	!	suffixes and tense ending in <e>
	!
	!		tag 'go'		tegi 'to go'			tegeen 'they went'
	!		bax 'leave'		bexi 'to leave'			bexeen 'they left'

	! <k> deletion
	!	
	!	<k> is deleted when it follows a back consonant (which is not <k> itself):
	!
	!		wax + ka => waxa
	!		magac + ka => magaca
	!		rah + ka => raha
	!

	! <l> + <t> -> <sh>
	!
	!	Occurs only across morpheme boundaries, in verbs and nouns.
	!
	!		wiilal		=>		wiilasha
	!		'boys'		  		'the boys'

	!		maqal		=>		maqashay
	!		'listen'			'2Sg/3SgF listened'


	! Vowel harmony
	!
	!	For a complete description of vowel harmony, see the literature.
	!
	!	Short summary: +ATR is the active spreading feature, and spreads leftward across all
	!	boundaries but is blocked by pauses in speech (Intonation Phrase). +ATR can spread
	!	rightward, but stops at the word boundary. It does not cross clitics, typically.
	!
	!	Hopefully VH will be covered in this analyzer.

	! Tonal Processes
	!
	!	In certain environments Somali appears to dislike having two tones immediately next
	!	to eachother. I have some collected environments for a phonology paper. May not be
	!	super important right off the bat.

	! Reduplication
	!	
	!	Somali has two kinds of reduplication: partial and full. Reduplication is typically
	!	a strategy for marking plural in nouns and adjectives in some declensions, but also
	!	appears in verbs as a derivational process. The inflectional processes are quite
	!	productive, but the derivational processes are not as productive.
	!
	!	Partial reduplication occurs in the 4th declension of nouns, but a subtype of these
	!	4th declensional nouns also has full reduplication. Partial reduplication includes
	!	epenthesis of <a>. Note that partial reduplication in adjectives is prefixing,
	!	while in nouns it is suffixing. Also, the template is slightly different.
	!
	!		af 'mouth, language'		=>		afaf	'... +Pl'
	!		qoys 'family'				=>		qoysas	'... +Pl'
	!
	!	*Note: There may be some partial reduplication that also copies the vowel.
	!
	!	Full reduplication also applies to some of these nouns:
	!
	!		qof 'person'				=> 		qofqof
	!		cad 'part'					=>		cadcad
	!
	!	Adjectives:
	!
	!		quruxsán 'beautiful'		=>		qurquruxsán ' ... +Pl'
	!		fudúd 'easy, light'			=>		fudfudúd
	!		adág 'difficult'			=>		ad'adág
	!		yár 'a little'				=>		yaryára
	!
	!		gaabán 'short'				=>		gaaggaabán ' ... +Pl'
	!		laabán 'folded'				=>		laallaabán
	!		jabán 'broken'				=>		'jajabán'
	!
	!	Irregular adjectives:
	!
	!		dhéer 'long, tall (sg)'		=>		dhaadhéer
	!		wéyn 'big'					=>		waawéyn
	!
	!	Note: Other possibilities might be found greping: with '^\(.\)aa\1e', '^\(.\)aa\1\1aa',
	!		 '\(.\)a\1$'

	! Person morphemes
	!	
	!	The realization of personal suffixes on verbs is a little complex and depends mostly on
	!	declension type and whether or not the suffix is preceded by the progressive.
	!	
	!	Realization of these suffixes is currently all handled by twolc:
	!		
	!						sg			pl				
	!			1			{đ}			{ñ} 	==>		
	!			2			{ŧ}			0				
	!			3 Masc		{đ}			{đ}				
	!			3 Fem	    {ŧ}							
	!
	!			Declension 1
	!	
	!						sg			pl					
	!			1			keenaa		keennaa			1		dhacay		dhacnay
	!			2			keentaa		keenaan			2		dhacday		dheceen
	!			3 Masc		keenaa		keentaan		3 Masc	dhacay		dhecdeen
	!			3 Fem		keentaa						3 Fem	dhacday
	
	!			Declension 2
	!
	!						sg			pl						sg
	!			1			sameeyay	sameynay		1		kariyay		karinay
	!			2			sameysay	sameyseen		2		karisay		kariseen
	!			3 Masc		sameeyay	sameeyeen		3 Masc	kariyay		kariyeen
	!			3 Fem		sameysay					3 Fem	karisay

	!			Declension 3

	!						sg			pl					
	!			1			furay		furannay			1		watay		wadannay
	!			2			furtay		furateen			2		wadatay		wadateen
	!			3 Masc		furay		fureen				3 Masc	watay		wateen
	!			3 Fem		furtay							3 Fem	wadatay

	
	! 	A short summary:
	
	!			%{đ%} - 1Sg, 3SgM and 3Pl; 	realized as 0/y/d in classes
	!			%{ŧ%} - 2Sg, 3SgF, 2Pl; 	realized as t/s in classes 
	!			%{ñ%} - 1Pl;				realized as n in all classes
	!										  'special' here just in case.

	!	This process could easily be removed from twolc and done in just flag diacritics, why not?

	! More processes to describe:
	!
	! wataa / wadatay dissimilation
	! a/e alternation in -e nouns (noun type is a bit more complex too, as corpus reveals)
	! vowel deletion ilig, ilko
	! e/y alternation in samee- verbs
	! w/b alternations
	! vowel lengthening magaalo / magaalooyin



! Notes:
!  If forms disappear but the rule should work, make sure
!  that the pair transforming exists in the Alphabet

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ' C ´ ´´ 
 
 á í ú é ó ý ẃ
 ä ï ü ë ö 
 sh kh dh 
  
 %^V:0 C
 
 %^:0

 %#
 %{N%}:0
 
 %{PREFIXING%}:0
 %{PROG%}:0
 %{INF%}

 ! Morphophon
 %{o%}

 %{m%} ! #CODA_N
 %{mm%}:m ! block m-n 
 ! o:a

 %{a%}:0
 %{ŧ%}:t
 %{đ%}
 %{ñ%}

 %{E%}:e

 %{e%}
 %{a%}            ! V3B with -a root deletion
 %{%-e%}:0
 %{%-a%}:0
 %{%-w%}:0
 %{%-V%}:0
 %{%-a%}:0
 %{%-VV%}:0
 %{%-I%}:0
 
 %{y%}:y

 %{C2%}
 %{C3A%}
 %{C3B%}
 %{C3C%}
 %{n%}:n
 %{ae%}
 %{d%}:d

 %{ATR%}:0
 %{aá%}:0
 %{áa%}:0
 %{aa%}:0

 ! Boundary markers
 ! Ideally %{#%} for root boundary, %{##%} for word-final. Pro'lly inconsistent
 ! about this, but something worth going through and checking.
 ! For testing remove :0 to see boundaries
 %{#%}:0
 %{##%}:0 %>:0
 

 %{t%}:t

 ! Trigger for t + d contraction in 3B
 ! Also ablaut blocker
 %{X%}:0
%{e%} ;

Sets

 A =      a           á           ä              ;
 E =        e           é           ë            ;
 I =          i           í           ï          ;
 O =            o           ó           ö        ;
 U =              u           ú           ü      ;

 Y =                y           ý                ;

 Vowels = A E I O U Y %{ae%} %{o%} %{e%} %{a%} ;
 
 BackV =  a e i o u ; ! aa ee ii oo uu ;
 FrontV = ä ë ï ö ü ; ! ää ëë ïï öö üü ; 

 Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z dh %{m%} %{mm%} %{n%} kh sh ' ;
 Back = c x h ' q kh ;
 Approximants = w y ;

 TonalUnits = a e i o u y w á é í ó ú ý ẃ ;
 AtonalV = a e i o u y w ;
  TonalV = á é í ó ú ý ẃ ;
 Gutteral = q kh c x h ' ;
 TDalt = q kh c x h ' d w y ;
 

 VceStop = b d g dh ;
 VcelStop = t k ;

 Dummy = %> C %{aá%} %{áa%} %{#%} %{##%} %{X%} %{N%} %{V1%} %{V2A%} %{V2B%} %{V3A%} %{V3B%} 
			%{PREFIXING%} %{PROG%} %{INF%} %{ATR%} ; ! other verb classes here?

 Letters = a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ' ´
			dh sh kh 
			;

 MorphoPhon =
			%{aá%} %{áa%} %{#%} %{##%} %{m%} %{C2%} %{C3A%} %{C3B%} %{C3C%} %{t%} %{d%} %{X%} 
			%{ae%} %{ŧ%} %{đ%} %{ñ%} %{e%} %{n%} %{o%} %{ATR%} 
			%{PROG%}
			;
 Tones = %{aá%} %{áa%} %{aa%} ´ ´´ ;

 WordChars = Letters MorphoPhon ;

Definitions
 WordBoundary = [ %{##%}:0 | %{#%}:0 | %>:0 | %>:0 ] ;
 MorphBoundary = [ %{#%}:0 ] ;

 TonePattern = [ %{aá%} | %{áa%} | %{aa%} | ´ | ´´ ] ;
 PostN = TonePattern %{#%}:0 %{N%}:0 ;

Rules

! magac -> magicii, magucu
! TODO: magacu, madaxiisa/madixiisa
! magac+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Nom+Prox	magac%{#%}%{N%}ku%{##%}
! gac^a%{m%}%{aá%}%{#%}%{N%}ah%{#%}íisu%{##%}

! wuxuu

! for some reason adding environment for gacmihiisu blocks gacmaha 

! TODO: gacmihiisu / gacmahiisu free variation 
!! ilig+N+Masc+Pl+Def+PxSg3M+Abs+Prox       il^ik%{aá%}%{#%}%{N%}a%{#%}híisa%{##%}
!!   -- > ilkihiisa 
!! walaal+N+Masc+Pl+Def+PxSg3M+Abs+Prox     walaal%{áa%}%{#%}%{N%}a%{#%}híisa%{##%}
!!   -- > walaalihiisa 

!! magac+N+Masc+Sg+Def+Abs+Dist				magac%{áa%}%{#%}%{N%}kii%{##%}
!!   -- > magicii 
!! magac+N+Masc+Sg+Def+Nom+Prox				magac%{áa%}%{#%}%{N%}ku%{##%}
!!   -- > magucu 
!! magac+N+Masc+Sg+Def+PxSg3F+Abs+Prox      magac%{áa%}%{#%}%{N%}kíisa%{##%}
!!   -- > magiciisa 
!! waxa+CS+Foc/R+Sg3M      wax%{#%}uu%{##%}
!!   -- > wuxuu


!! TODO: wixiisu not working
!! wax+N+Masc+Sg+Def+PxSg3M+Nom+Prox		wax%{áa%}%{#%}%{N%}kíisu%{##%}
!!   -- > wixiisu


! getting waxuu; tone marker blocks.
"Ablaut around back fricatives at morpheme boundaries"
 a:Cy <=> Cons _ Back ( Tones ) PostN ( k:0 ) Cy ;					!  ?
		  Cons _ Back ( Tones ) PostN k:0 Cy ;						! magucu
		  Cons _ Back ( Tones ) MorphBoundary :Cy ;				    ! wuxuu

	where Cy in (u i)

	matched ;

! aabb{-e}{e}´´{#}{N}h
! aabb{e}´´{#}{N}hii

"Ablaut in declension 7 with final vowel"
 %{e%}:Cy <=> Cons (%{%-e%}:0) _ PostN h Cy ;

	where Cy in (u i)

	matched ;


! #LT_SH

"LT -> SH part 1"
 l:s <=> _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 ( %{N%}:0 ) ( %{#%}:0 ) t: ;
 ! Also for V3B where there is d in triggering environment and interceding {a}
         _ %{a%}:0 ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 ( %{N%}:0 ) ( %{#%}:0 ) d: ;
 ! Also for V1 where a vowel deletes
         _ %{%-V%}:0 ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 ( %{#%}:0 ) t: ;


"LT -> SH part 2"
 t:h <=> l: ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 ( %{N%}:0 ) ( %{#%}:0 ) _ ;
         l: %{%-V%}:0 ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 ( %{N%}:0 ) ( %{#%}:0 ) _ ;

         ! In reduplicative plurals where l is reduplicated
         l: PostN [ Vowels | Vowels+ ] %{C2%}:s ( [ %{#%}:0 | %{#%}:0+ ] ) _ ;
         l: Tones %{N%}:0 a %{C2%}:s %{#%}:0 _ ;


"LT -> SH part 2 for V3B"
 d:h <=> l: %{a%}:0 ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 ( %{#%}:0 ) _ ;

"LT -> SH in reduplicative plurals, pt 1"
 %{C2%}:s <=> l Tones %{#%}:0 %{N%}:0 a _ %{#%}:0  t: ;

"V2 {y} deletion"
 %{y%}:0 <=> _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0+ y ;
 			 y _ ;
 			 i i _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0+ Cons;
 			 i _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0+ Cons;
 			 _ %{#%}:0 %{##%}:0 ;


"đ realization in nouns"
 %{đ%}:d <=> _ PostN ;

"Definite suffix -k to -g next to preceding voiced"
 k:g <=> [ :VC | Vowels ] PostN _ Vowels ;
 		 %{C2%}:g %{#%}:0 _ Vowels ;
	where VC in (g y w) ;

"t:0 before d h"
 CD:0 <=> d h Tones %{#%}:0 %{N%}:0 _ Vowels ;
    where CD in (d t) ;

"t/d alternation - definite suffix, V1"
 t:d <=> 
         ! In verbs
         TDalt (%{%-V%}:0) ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 _ ;
         i     (%{%-V%}:0) ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 _ ;
         ! Definite suffix: dhexda, xuquuqda
         TDalt  PostN _ Vowels ;
         Vowels PostN _ Vowels ;
